Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections
79-1901 to 79-1904 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Read, Educate, and Develop Youth Act.

Laws 2002, LB 326, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 35.